Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,135
Adult Education Program; expenses; how paid.

The Commissioner of Education may disburse, from funds appropriated for the State Department of Education, sufficient money for supervision, instruction, and other necessary expenses in conducting the Adult Education Program.

Laws 1927, c. 82, § 4, p. 249;

C.S.1929, § 79-2304;

R.S.1943, § 79-2304;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 407, p. 828;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1418;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 917.